Tennessee, session 114, HB0620.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-3-302(f), is amended by adding the
following new subdivision (6):
(6) A county having a population of not less than sixty-four thousand four
hundred (64,400) nor more than sixty-four thousand five hundred (64,500), according to
the 2020 federal census or a subsequent federal census;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0620
002660
- 1 -